Hawaii statutes.
§651-6 Action on bond. In an action on
the bond a plaintiff may recover, if the plaintiff shows that the attachment
was wrongfully sued out, the actual damages sustained and reasonable attorney's
fees, to be fixed by the court. If it is shown that the attachment was sued
out maliciously, the plaintiff may recover exemplary damages. No action shall
be maintained on any bond until after final judgment in the action, unless the
same is discontinued or dismissed. [L 1905, c 84, §6; am L 1909, c 60, §4; RL 1925,
§2810; RL 1935, §4195; RL 1945, §10146; RL 1955, §233-6; HRS §651-6; gen ch
1985; am L 1986, c 291, §2]

Case Notes

Not entitled to recovery on attachment bond where no damage
accrued. 1 H. 51 (1851).

Action on bond, when maintainable. 14 H. 463 (1902).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next